ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2m	Y	32	
SFX	2m	أ	ئينه/AcAgAkh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئينه/AcAgAkh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	ينه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ئينه/BcBgBkh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	ينه/AcAgAkh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	2m	أ	ئيه/AcAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئيه/AcAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	يه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ئيه/BcBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	يه/AcAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	2m	أ	ئانه/AcAgAkh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئانه/AcAgAkh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	انه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	0	يانه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ئيانه/BcBgBkh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	انه/AcAgAkh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	2m	أ	ئاه/AcAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئاه/AcAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	اه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	0	ياه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ئياه/BcBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	اه/AcAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	2m	أ	ئونه/AcAgAkh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئونه/AcAgAkh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	ونه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ؤونه/BcBgBkh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	ونه/AcAgAkh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	2m	أ	ئوه/AcAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	2m	اء	يئوه/AcAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	2m	0	وه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	2m	أى	ؤوه/BcBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	2m	0	وه/AcAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]

#أنتن
SFX	3m	Y	5	
SFX	3m	أ	ئنه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	3m	اء	ئنه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	3m	0	ينه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	3m	أى	ئينه/BcBgBkBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	3m	0	نه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]

#هو
SFX	4m	Y	9	
SFX	4m	أ	ئه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	أ
SFX	4m	اء	يئه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	اء
SFX	4m	اء	ئه/AdAth0X0	اء
SFX	4m	0	ه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	ي
SFX	4m	0	اه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	ي
SFX	4m	0	اه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	ي
SFX	4m	أى	ئيه/BdBhBlBpBth0X0	أى
SFX	4m	أى	ئه/BdBth0X0	أى
SFX	4m	0	ه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	[^أىءي]

#هي
SFX	5m	Y	9	
SFX	5m	أ	ئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	5m	اء	يئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	5m	اء	ئه/AcAsh0X0	اء
SFX	5m	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	5m	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	5m	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	5m	أى	ئيه/BcBgBkBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	5m	أى	ئه/BcBsh0X0	أى
SFX	5m	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]

#هما
SFX	6m	Y	24	
SFX	6m	أ	ئانه/AdAhAlh0X0	أ
SFX	6m	اء	يئانه/AdAhAlh0X0	اء
SFX	6m	0	انه/AdAhAlh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	0	يانه/AdAhAlh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	أى	ئيانه/BdBhBlh0X0	أى
SFX	6m	0	انه/AdAhAlh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	6m	أ	ئاه/AdApAth0X0	أ
SFX	6m	اء	يئاه/AdApAth0X0	اء
SFX	6m	0	اه/AdApAth0X0	ي
SFX	6m	0	ياه/AdApAth0X0	ي
SFX	6m	أى	ئياه/BdBpBth0X0	أى
SFX	6m	0	اه/AdApAth0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	6m	أ	ئانه/AcAgAkh0X0	أ
SFX	6m	اء	يئانه/AcAgAkh0X0	اء
SFX	6m	0	انه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	0	يانه/AcAgAkh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	أى	ئيانه/BcBgBkh0X0	أى
SFX	6m	0	انه/AcAgAkh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	6m	أ	ئاه/AcAoAsh0X0	أ
SFX	6m	اء	يئاه/AcAoAsh0X0	اء
SFX	6m	0	اه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	0	ياه/AcAoAsh0X0	ي
SFX	6m	أى	ئياه/BcBoBsh0X0	أى
SFX	6m	0	اه/AcAoAsh0X0	[^أىءي]

#هم
SFX	7m	Y	10	
SFX	7m	أ	ئونه/AdAhAlh0X0	أ
SFX	7m	اء	يئونه/AdAhAlh0X0	اء
SFX	7m	0	ونه/AdAhAlh0X0	ي
SFX	7m	أى	ؤونه/BdBhBlh0X0	أى
SFX	7m	0	ونه/AdAhAlh0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	7m	أ	ئوه/AdApAth0X0	أ
SFX	7m	اء	يئوه/AdApAth0X0	اء
SFX	7m	0	وه/AdApAth0X0	ي
SFX	7m	أى	ؤوه/BdBpBth0X0	أى
SFX	7m	0	وه/AdApAth0X0	[^أىءي]

#هن
SFX	8m	Y	5	
SFX	8m	أ	ئنه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	أ
SFX	8m	اء	ئنه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	اء
SFX	8m	0	ينه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	ي
SFX	8m	أى	ئينه/BdBhBlBpBth0X0	أى
SFX	8m	0	نه/AdAhAlApAth0X0	[^أىءي]

############لواحق#الماضي-غير-عاقل####################
	

#-أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا

SFX	1o	Y	45
SFX	1o	ت	ته/Hah0	ت
SFX	1o	ن	ناه/Hah0	ن
SFX	1o	ت	تماه/Hah0	ت
SFX	1o	ت	تموه/Hah0	ت
SFX	1o	ت	تنه/Hah0	ت
SFX	1o	ا	وته/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	وناه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	وتماه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	وتموه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	وتنه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	يته/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	يناه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	يتماه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	يتموه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	1o	ا	يتنه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	1o	ى	يته/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1o	ى	يناه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1o	ى	يتماه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1o	ى	يتموه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1o	ى	يتنه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1o	اءى	اءيته/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	1o	اءى	اءيناه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	1o	اءى	اءيتماه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	1o	اءى	اءيتموه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	1o	اءى	اءيتنه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	1o	أى	أيته/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	1o	أى	أيناه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	1o	أى	أيتماه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	1o	أى	أيتموه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	1o	أى	أيتنه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	1o	آ	أوته/Hah0	آ
SFX	1o	آ	أوناه/Hah0	آ
SFX	1o	آ	أوتماه/Hah0	آ
SFX	1o	آ	أوتموه/Hah0	آ
SFX	1o	آ	أوتنه/Hah0	آ
SFX	1o	اء	ؤته/Hah0	اء
SFX	1o	اء	ؤناه/Hah0	اء
SFX	1o	اء	ؤتماه/Hah0	اء
SFX	1o	اء	ؤتموه/Hah0	اء
SFX	1o	اء	ؤتنه/Hah0	اء
SFX	1o	0	ته/Hah0	[^تاآىء]
SFX	1o	0	ناه/Hah0	[^ناآىء]
SFX	1o	0	تماه/Hah0	[^تاآىء]
SFX	1o	0	تموه/Hah0	[^تاآىء]
SFX	1o	0	تنه/Hah0	[^تاآىء]

#خاص-بفعل-أساء/استاء/استناء
#-أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا
SFX	?o	Y	10
SFX	?o	اء	أته/Hah0	اء
SFX	?o	اء	أناه/Hah0	اء
SFX	?o	اء	أتماه/Hah0	اء
SFX	?o	اء	أتموه/Hah0	اء
SFX	?o	اء	أتنه/Hah0	اء
SFX	?o	0	ته/Hah0	[^ء]
SFX	?o	0	ناه/Hah0	[^ء]
SFX	?o	0	تماه/Hah0	[^ء]
SFX	?o	0	تموه/Hah0	[^ء]
SFX	?o	0	تنه/Hah0	[^ء]

#-هو
SFX	2o	Y	5
SFX	2o	ا	اه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	2o	ا	اه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	2o	ى	اه/Hah0	[^أ]ى
SFX	2o	أى	آه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	2o	0	ه/Hah0	[^اى]

#-هي
SFX	3o	Y	7
SFX	3o	ا	ته/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	3o	ا	ته/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	3o	ى	ته/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	3o	آ	أته/Hah0	آ
SFX	3o	اءى	اءته/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	3o	أى	أته/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	3o	0	ته/Hah0	[^اآى]

#-هما-مذكر
SFX	4o	Y	8
SFX	4o	ا	واه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	4o	ا	ياه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	4o	ى	ياه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	4o	أ	آه/Hah0	أ
SFX	4o	آ	أواه/Hah0	آ
SFX	4o	اءى	اءياه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	4o	أى	أياه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	4o	0	اه/Hah0	[^أاآى]

#-هما-مؤنث
SFX	5o	Y	8
SFX	5o	ا	تاه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	5o	ا	تاه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	5o	ى	تاه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	5o	أ	أتاه/Hah0	أ
SFX	5o	آ	أتاه/Hah0	آ
SFX	5o	اءى	اءتاه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	5o	أى	أتاه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	5o	0	تاه/Hah0	[^أاآى]
#خاص-بفعلي-آتى-وتأخّى
#-هما-مؤنث
SFX	&o	Y	2
SFX	&o	0	تاه/Hah0	[^ى]
SFX	&o	ى	يتاه/Hah0	ى

#-هم
SFX	6o	Y	12
SFX	6o	ا	وه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	6o	ا	وه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	6o	و	وه/Hah0	و
SFX	6o	ى	وه/Hah0	[^أء]ى
SFX	6o	أ	ؤوه/Hah0	أ
SFX	6o	آ	أوه/Hah0	آ
SFX	6o	ئي	ؤوه/Hah0	[ئ]ي
SFX	6o	ي	وه/Hah0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	6o	اءى	اءوه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	6o	أى	أوه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	6o	اء	اؤوه/Hah0	اء
SFX	6o	0	وه/Hah0	[^أاآويىء]

#-هن
SFX	7o	Y	9
SFX	7o	ن	نه/Hah0	ن
SFX	7o	ا	ونه/Hah0	[^ي]ا
SFX	7o	ا	ينه/Hah0	[ي]ا
SFX	7o	ى	ينه/Hah0	ى
SFX	7o	آ	أونه/Hah0	آ
SFX	7o	اءى	اءينه/Hah0	[ء]ى
SFX	7o	أى	أينه/Hah0	[أ]ى
SFX	7o	اء	ؤنه/Hah0	اء
SFX	7o	0	نه/Hah0	[^ناآىء]
#-خاص-بأساء/استاء/استناء
#-هن
SFX	$o	Y	2
SFX	$o	اء	أنه/Hah0	اء
SFX	$o	0	نه/Hah0	[^ء]

#أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا
SFX	1p	Y	10
SFX	1p	ت	ته/Hbh0X0	ت
SFX	1p	ت	تماه/Hbh0X0	ت
SFX	1p	ت	تموه/Hbh0X0	ت
SFX	1p	ت	تنه/Hbh0X0	ت
SFX	1p	ن	ناه/Hbh0X0	ن
SFX	1p	0	ته/Hbh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1p	0	تماه/Hbh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1p	0	تموه/Hbh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1p	0	تنه/Hbh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1p	0	ناه/Hbh0X0	[^ن]

#-هو
SFX	2p	Y	1
SFX	2p	0	ه/Hbh0X0	.

#-هي
SFX	3p	Y	1
SFX	3p	0	ته/Hbh0X0	.

#-هما-مذكر
SFX	4p	Y	1
SFX	4p	0	اه/Hbh0X0	.

#-هما-مؤنث
SFX	5p	Y	1
SFX	5p	0	تاه/Hbh0X0	.

#-هم
SFX	6p	Y	1
SFX	6p	0	وه/Hbh0X0	.

#-هن
SFX	7p	Y	2
SFX	7p	ن	نه/Hbh0X0	ن
SFX	7p	0	نه/Hbh0X0	[^ن]

#أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا
SFX	1q	Y	10
SFX	1q	ت	ته/Hch0X0	ت
SFX	1q	ت	تماه/Hch0X0	ت
SFX	1q	ت	تموه/Hch0X0	ت
SFX	1q	ت	تنه/Hch0X0	ت
SFX	1q	ن	ناه/Hch0X0	ن
SFX	1q	0	ته/Hch0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1q	0	تماه/Hch0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1q	0	تموه/Hch0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1q	0	تنه/Hch0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1q	0	ناه/Hch0X0	[^ن]

#-هو
SFX	2q	Y	1
SFX	2q	0	ه/Hch0X0	.

#-هي
SFX	3q	Y	1
SFX	3q	0	ته/Hch0X0	.

#-هما-مذكر
SFX	4q	Y	1
SFX	4q	0	اه/Hch0X0	.

#-هما-مؤنث
SFX	5q	Y	1
SFX	5q	0	تاه/Hch0X0	.

#-هم
SFX	6q	Y	1
SFX	6q	0	وه/Hch0X0	.

#-هن
SFX	7q	Y	2
SFX	7q	ن	نه/Hch0X0	ن
SFX	7q	0	نه/Hch0X0	[^ن]

#أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا
SFX	1r	Y	10
SFX	1r	ت	ته/Hdh0X0	ت
SFX	1r	ت	تماه/Hdh0X0	ت
SFX	1r	ت	تموه/Hdh0X0	ت
SFX	1r	ت	تنه/Hdh0X0	ت
SFX	1r	ن	ناه/Hdh0X0	ن
SFX	1r	0	ته/Hdh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1r	0	تماه/Hdh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1r	0	تموه/Hdh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1r	0	تنه/Hdh0X0	[^ت]
SFX	1r	0	ناه/Hdh0X0	[^ن]

#-هن
SFX	7r	Y	2
SFX	7r	ن	نه/Hdh0X0	ن
SFX	7r	0	نه/Hdh0X0	[^ن]

#مع-سوابق-استثنائية-خاصة-بالأفعال-/آس-I/آد-آ->اي-واستآ->استئي
#-هو
SFX	2r	Y	1
SFX	2r	0	ه/Heh0X0	.

#-هي
SFX	3r	Y	1
SFX	3r	0	ته/Heh0X0	.

#-هما-مذكر
SFX	4r	Y	1
SFX	4r	0	اه/Heh0X0	.

#-هما-مؤنث
SFX	5r	Y	1
SFX	5r	0	تاه/Heh0X0	.

#-هم
SFX	6r	Y	1
SFX	6r	0	وه/Heh0X0	.
